District of Columbia statutes.
5-543.04

Promotion or transfer.

(a)

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) or (c) of this section, any officer or member who is promoted or transferred to a higher salary class shall receive basic compensation at the lowest scheduled rate of such higher salary class which exceeds his existing scheduled rate of basic compensation by not less than 1 step increase of the next higher step of the salary class from which he is promoted or transferred.

(b)

Any officer or member receiving additional compensation as provided in § 5-543.02 who is promoted or transferred to a higher salary class shall receive basic compensation at the lowest scheduled rate of such higher class which exceeds his existing scheduled rate of basic compensation by at least the sum of 1 step increase of the next higher step of the salary class from which he is promoted or transferred and the amount of such additional compensation.

(c)

Notwithstanding any other law or regulation, employees appointed pursuant to § 1-610.72 shall receive compensation as a result of promotion or transfer in accordance with this section.

(d)

(1)

Each officer and member of the United States Park Police who is promoted or transferred to a higher salary shall receive basic compensation in accordance with the officer’s or member’s total creditable service.

(2)

For purposes of this subsection, an officer’s or member’s creditable service is any police service in pay status with the United States Secret Service Uniformed Division, United States Park Police, or Metropolitan Police Department.

History

Aug. 1, 1958, 72 Stat. 484, Pub. L. 85-584, title III, § 304
Oct. 24, 1962, 76 Stat. 1243, Pub. L. 87-882, § 3(c)
June 30, 1970, 84 Stat. 356, Pub. L. 91-297, title I, § 105
Aug. 29, 1972, 86 Stat. 638, Pub. L. 92-410, title I, § 108
Oct. 4, 2000, D.C. Law 13-160, § 103(f), 47 DCR 4619
Dec. 21, 2000, 114 Stat. 2763, Pub. L. 106-554, § 1(a)(4), H.R. 5666 § 904(b)
Oct. 15, 2010, 124 Stat. 3033, Pub. L. 111-282, § 4(b)(2)(E)

Section References

This section is referenced in § 5-545.06a and § 5-561.02.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 4-413.
1973 Ed., § 4-830.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 13-160 added subsec. (c), relating to employees appointed pursuant to § 1-610.72.
Pub. L. 111-282, in subsec. (d)(1), deleted “the United States Secret Service Uniformed Division or” following “member of”.

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 3(f) of Lateral Appointment of Law Enforcement Officers Temporary Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Law 13-61, October 12, 1999, law notification 47 DCR 1983).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 3(f) of Lateral Appointment of Law Enforcement Officers Clarifying Temporary Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Law 13-102, January 10, 2000, law notification 47 DCR 4339).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 3(f) of the Lateral Appointment of Law Enforcement Officers Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-137, August 4, 1999, 46 DCR 6802).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 3(f) of the Lateral Appointment of Law Enforcement Officers Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-175, November 2, 1999, 46 DCR 9236).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 3(f) of the Lateral Appointment of Law Enforcement Officers Clarifying Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-231, January 11, 2000, 47 DCR 506).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 3(f) of the Lateral Appointment of Law Enforcement Officers Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-305, April 7, 2000, 47 DCR 2701).